Hawaii statutes.
§262-5 Procedure for adoption of zoning
regulations. (a) The director of transportation shall adopt airport zoning
regulations in accordance with chapter 91.

(b) At least ninety days before the public
hearing on the initial zoning of any airport hazard area, the director shall
notify the appropriate state and county planning agencies and any boards or
commissions of a similar nature which may be concerned, and thirty days before
the public hearing such agencies, boards, and commissions may file with the
director their recommendations as to the boundaries of the various zones to be
established and the regulations to be adopted therefor. The director shall
give due consideration to recommendations so filed. [L 1965, c 140, pt of §1;
Supp, §17A-5; HRS §262-5]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next